Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4002
Plasma donation; consent.

Any individual of sound mind and eighteen years of age or more may consent to donate plasma without the permission of a parent or guardian. The consent is not subject to later disaffirmance because of minority.

Laws 2016, LB813, § 1.
July 21, 2016